Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3156.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Methods of payment.
(a) No contract between a dental plan or other healthcare entity and a dentist for the
provision of services to beneficiaries shall require the dentist to accept payment exclusively by
means of any form of payment method that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release
payment including virtual credit cards. A dental plan or other healthcare entity may initiate or
change to a payment methodology that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release payment,
including virtual credit card payments, if the dental plan or healthcare entity:
(1) Informs the dentist of all available methods of payment;
(2) Provides clear and accessible instructions for the selection of an alternative method of
payment;
(3) Ensures that the dentist may exercise such selection without restriction; and
(4) The provider or a designee of the provider elects, through express acceptance, to accept
a payment of the claim using the credit card or electronic funds transfer payment method. Violation
of express acceptance nullifies any election on claim payment methodology until such time as
express agreement is executed.
(b) Neither the dental plan, the healthcare entity, nor any affiliated healthcare payments
platform shall impose any fee or charge upon the dentist for access to payment or claims data; the

transmission or processing of payment; or the issuance or mailing of payment.
(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Alternative payment method" means any form of payment other than virtual credit
cards such as electronic funds transfers ("EFT") or automated clearing house payment ("ACH") or
paper check.
(2) "Dental plan" means a policy or program that provides a specified level of dental
benefits for procedures rendered by a dentist or hygienist, to a member or subscriber.
(3) "Dentist" means a licensed individual under chapter 31.1 of title 5 ("dentists and dental
hygienists").
(4) "Express acceptance" means a clear and direct agreement to the terms of payment
method, communicated explicitly by the dental plan to the dentist, in writing, signifying acceptance
of the payment method without any ambiguity or implied actions.
(5) "Healthcare entity" means any for profit or nonprofit dental service corporation or any
for profit or nonprofit hospital service corporation providing dental plans or any other entity
providing dental plans and entering into provider contracts with dentists in the State of Rhode
Island.
(6) "Healthcare payments platform" means any form of payment processor directly linked
to or under contract with a healthcare entity.
(7) "Virtual credit card" means a form of electronic funds transfer utilizing a single-use
series of numbers and specific payment amount which the payee is required to process manually.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Methods of payment.
(a) No contract between a dental plan or other healthcare entity and a dentist for the
provision of services to beneficiaries shall require the dentist to accept payment exclusively by
means of any form of payment method that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release
payment including virtual credit cards. A dental plan or other healthcare entity may initiate or
change to a payment methodology that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release payment,
including virtual credit card payments, if the dental plan or healthcare entity:
(1) Informs the dentist of all available methods of payment;
(2) Provides clear and accessible instructions for the selection of an alternative method of
payment;
(3) Ensures that the dentist may exercise such selection without restriction; and
LC006202 - Page 2 of 7

(4) The provider or a designee of the provider elects, through express acceptance, to accept
a payment of the claim using the credit card or electronic funds transfer payment method. Violation
of express acceptance nullifies any election on claim payment methodology until such time as
express agreement is executed.
(b) Neither the dental plan, the healthcare entity, nor any affiliated healthcare payments
platform shall impose any fee or charge upon the dentist for access to payment or claims data; the
transmission or processing of payment; or the issuance or mailing of payment.
(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Alternative payment method" means any form of payment other than virtual credit
cards such as electronic funds transfers ("EFT") or automated clearing house payment ("ACH") or
paper check.
(2) "Dental plan" means a policy or program that provides a specified level of dental
benefits for procedures rendered by a dentist or hygienist, to a member or subscriber.
(3) "Dentist" means a licensed individual under chapter 31.1 of title 5 ("dentists and dental
hygienists").
(4) "Express acceptance" means a clear and direct agreement to the terms of payment
method, communicated explicitly by the dental plan to the dentist, in writing, signifying acceptance
of the payment method without any ambiguity or implied actions.
(5) "Healthcare entity" means any for profit or nonprofit dental service corporation or any
for profit or nonprofit hospital service corporation providing dental plans or any other entity
providing dental plans and entering into provider contracts with dentists in the State of Rhode
Island.
(6) "Healthcare payments platform" means any form of payment processor directly linked
to or under contract with a healthcare entity.
(7) "Virtual credit card" means a form of electronic funds transfer utilizing a single-use
series of numbers and specific payment amount which the payee is required to process manually.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Methods of payment.
(a) No contract between a dental plan or other healthcare entity and a dentist for the
provision of services to beneficiaries shall require the dentist to accept payment exclusively by
means of any form of payment method that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release
payment including virtual credit cards. A dental plan or other healthcare entity may initiate or
LC006202 - Page 3 of 7

change to a payment methodology that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release payment,
including virtual credit card payments, if the dental plan or healthcare entity:
(1) Informs the dentist of all available methods of payment;
(2) Provides clear and accessible instructions for the selection of an alternative method of
payment;
(3) Ensures that the dentist may exercise such selection without restriction; and
(4) The provider or a designee of the provider elects, through express acceptance, to accept
a payment of the claim using the credit card or electronic funds transfer payment method. Violation
of express acceptance nullifies any election on claim payment methodology until such time as
express agreement is executed.
(b) Neither the dental plan, the healthcare entity, nor any affiliated healthcare payments
platform shall impose any fee or charge upon the dentist for access to payment or claims data; the
transmission or processing of payment; or the issuance or mailing of payment.
(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Alternative payment method" means any form of payment other than virtual credit
cards such as electronic funds transfers ("EFT") or automated clearing house payment ("ACH") or
paper check.
(2) "Dental plan" means a policy or program that provides a specified level of dental
benefits for procedures rendered by a dentist or hygienist, to a member or subscriber.
(3) "Dentist" means a licensed individual under chapter 31.1 of title 5 ("dentists and dental
hygienists").
(4) "Express acceptance" means a clear and direct agreement to the terms of payment
method, communicated explicitly by the dental plan to the dentist, in writing, signifying acceptance
of the payment method without any ambiguity or implied actions.
(5) "Healthcare entity" means any for profit or nonprofit dental service corporation or any
for profit or nonprofit hospital service corporation providing dental plans or any other entity
providing dental plans and entering into provider contracts with dentists in the State of Rhode
Island.
(6) "Healthcare payments platform" means any form of payment processor directly linked
to or under contract with a healthcare entity.
(7) "Virtual credit card" means a form of electronic funds transfer utilizing a single-use
series of numbers and specific payment amount which the payee is required to process manually.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
LC006202 - Page 4 of 7

Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Methods of payment.
(a) No contract between a dental plan or other healthcare entity and a dentist for the
provision of services to beneficiaries shall require the dentist to accept payment exclusively by
means of any form of payment method that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release
payment including virtual credit cards. A dental plan or other healthcare entity may initiate or
change to a payment methodology that requires dentists to pay fees or charges to release payment,
including virtual credit card payments, if the dental plan or healthcare entity:
(1) Informs the dentist of all available methods of payment;
(2) Provides clear and accessible instructions for the selection of an alternative method of
payment;
(3) Ensures that the dentist may exercise such selection without restriction; and
(4) The provider or a designee of the provider elects, through express acceptance, to accept
a payment of the claim using the credit card or electronic funds transfer payment method. Violation
of express acceptance nullifies any election on claim payment methodology until such time as
express agreement is executed.
(b) Neither the dental plan, the healthcare entity, nor any affiliated healthcare payments
platform shall impose any fee or charge upon the dentist for access to payment or claims data; the
transmission or processing of payment; or the issuance or mailing of payment.
(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Alternative payment method" means any form of payment other than virtual credit
cards such as electronic funds transfers ("EFT") or automated clearing house payment ("ACH") or
paper check.
(2) "Dental plan" means a policy or program that provides a specified level of dental
benefits for procedures rendered by a dentist or hygienist, to a member or subscriber.
(3) "Dentist" means a licensed individual under chapter 31.1 of title 5 ("dentists and dental
hygienists").
(4) "Express acceptance" means a clear and direct agreement to the terms of payment
method, communicated explicitly by the dental plan to the dentist, in writing, signifying acceptance
of the payment method without any ambiguity or implied actions.
(5) "Healthcare entity" means any for profit or nonprofit dental service corporation or any
for profit or nonprofit hospital service corporation providing dental plans or any other entity
providing dental plans and entering into provider contracts with dentists in the State of Rhode
LC006202 - Page 5 of 7

Island.
(6) "Healthcare payments platform" means any form of payment processor directly linked
to or under contract with a healthcare entity.
(7) "Virtual credit card" means a form of electronic funds transfer utilizing a single-use
series of numbers and specific payment amount which the payee is required to process manually.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006202
========
LC006202 - Page 6 of 7